en: Rosin grade: Dark; Light; Medium; Other
pt-PT: Grau de resina: Escuro; Ligeira; Médio; Outro
nl: Colofoniumkwaliteit: Donker; Licht; Medium; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta kolofonija: Tamni; Svijetli; Srednje tamni; Ostalo
pl: Klasa kalafonii: Ciemny; Lekki; Środek; Inne
zh-TW: 松香等級: 深; 輕型; 媒介; 其他
ru: Сорт канифоли: Темная; Светлая; Средняя; Другая
fr: Qualité de la colophane: Foncé; Léger; Moyen; Autre
es: Grado de resina: Oscuro; Ligero; Medio; Otros
bg-BG: Клас колофон: Тъмен; Светъл; Среден; Други
cs: Typ kalafuny: Tmavý; Lehká; Médium; Jiné
nb: Harpikskvalitet: Mørk; Lett; Middels; Annet
pt-BR: Grau de breu: Escuro; Leve; Médio; Outro
sv: Hartskvalitet: Mörk; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
vi: Loại nhựa thông: Sẫm màu; Nhẹ; Vừa; Khác
da: Harpikskvalitet: Mørk; Let; Medium; Andet
tr: Reçine Sınıfı: Koyu; Hafif; Orta; Diğer
ja: ロジンの等級: ダーク; 軽い; 媒体; その他
fi: Hartsiluokka: Tumma; Kevyt; Keskimääräinen; Muu
hu: Gyanta minősége: Sötét; Világos; Közepesen sötét; Egyéb
el: Βαθμός κολοφωνίου: Σκούρο; Ελαφριά; Μέση; Άλλο
lt-LT: Kanifolijos klasė: Tamsus; Šviesus; Vidutinis; Kita
de: Kolophoniumklasse: Dunkel; Leicht; Medium; Sonstiges
th: เกรดโรซิน: แบบเข้ม; ตึงเล็กน้อย; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Razred kolofonije: Temen; Svetel; Srednji; Drugo
zh-CN: 松香等级: 偏黑; 轻; 媒介; 其他
it: Gradazione della colofonia: Scuro; Leggero; Medio; Altro
sk-SK: Typ kolofónie: Tmavý; Ľahký; Stredný; Iné
ko: 로진 등급: 어두운; 가벼움; 매체; 기타
ro-RO: Tip colofoniu: Culoare închisă; Culoare deschisă; Mediu; Altele